Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 7. Penalties

§ 2761.
Offenses and penalties.

Any person who, by his or her actions or through the actions of an agent, performs any one of the acts enumerated in subdivisions (1) through (11) of this section shall be fined not less than $20.00 or more than $200.00, or be imprisoned not more than three months, or both; and upon a second or subsequent conviction thereof, he or she shall be fined not less than $50.00 or more than $500.00, or be imprisoned, or both.

Use, or have in possession for the purpose of using for any commercial purpose specified in section 2635 of this title, sell, offer, or expose for sale or hire, or have in possession for the purpose of selling or hiring, an incorrect weight or measure or any device or instrument used to or calculated to falsify any weight or measure.

Use, or have in possession for the purpose of current use for any commercial purpose specified in section 2635 of this title, a weight or measure that does not bear a seal or mark such as is specified in section 2639 of this title, unless such weight or measure has been exempted from testing by the provisions of section 2635 of this title, or by a regulation of the Secretary issued under the authority of section 2633 of this title, or unless the device has been placed in service as provided by a regulation of the Secretary issued under the authority of section 2633 of this title.

Dispose of any rejected or condemned weight or measure in a manner contrary to law or regulation.

Remove from any weight or measure, contrary to law or regulation, any tag, seal, or mark placed thereon by the appropriate authority.

Sell, or offer or expose for sale, less than the quantity he or she represents of any commodity, thing, or service.

Take more than the quantity he or she represents of any commodity, thing, or service, when, as buyer, he or she furnishes the weight or measure by means of which the amount of the commodity, thing, or service is determined.

Keep for the purpose of sale, advertise, or offer or expose for sale, or sell, any commodity, thing, or service in a condition or manner contrary to law or regulation.

Use in retail trade, except in the preparation of packages put up in advance of sale and of medical prescriptions, a weight or measure that is not so positioned that its indications may be accurately read and the weighing or measuring operation observed from some position that may reasonably be assumed by a customer.

Violate any provision of this chapter or of the regulations promulgated under the provisions of this chapter for which a specific penalty has not been prescribed.

Act as a licensed public weighmaster without first obtaining a license or certificate to do so, or at a time when such license is suspended or revoked.

Misrepresent the true weight, volume, or other measurement of any item which is the subject of a commercial transaction.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 39, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.),§§ 6a, 7;

1993, No. 74

, § 8.

§ 2762.
Hindering or obstructing officer.

Any person who hinders or obstructs in any way the Secretary, the Deputy Secretary, or any one of the inspectors, or a sealer or deputy sealer, in the performance of his or her official duties shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than $20.00 or more than $200.00, or by imprisonment for not more than three months, or by both.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 37, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2763.
Impersonation of officer.

Any person who impersonates in any way the Secretary, the Deputy Secretary, or any one of the inspectors, or a sealer or deputy sealer, by the use of his or her seal or a counterfeit of his or her seal, or in any other manner, shall be fined not less than $100.00 nor more than $500.00, or be imprisoned not more than 1 year, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 38, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2764.
Incorrect weight certificates.

Any person who requests a licensed public weighmaster to weigh any property, produce, commodity, or article falsely or incorrectly, or who requests a false or incorrect weight certificate, or any person who issues a weight certificate simulating the weight certificate prescribed in this chapter and who is not a licensed public weighmaster, shall be fined not less than $25.00 or more than $100.00; and upon a second or subsequent conviction that person shall be fined not less than $100.00 or more than $500.00, or be imprisoned not less than 30 days or more than 90 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 51, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2765.
Malfeasance.

Any licensed public weighmaster who falsifies a weight certificate, or who delegates his or her authority to any person not licensed as a licensed public weighmaster, shall be fined not less than $50.00 or more than $500.00, or be imprisoned not less than 30 days or more than 90 days, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 52, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2766.
Replacement of security seal; improper handling of weighing or measuring device.

Any service person who breaks a security seal must replace the security seal by installing a new lead and wire security seal bearing the imprint of his or her hand seal having a number registered with the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

Any person who violates any provision of sections 2725, 2727, 2728, 2729 inclusive of this title or a dealer or service person who does not have a certificate of registration in full force before engaging in that business, or any person who repairs his or her own weighing or measuring device, or breaks a security seal without a license and uses the device commercially before being tested by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets or permission is given for its use by the Secretary, shall be fined not more than $100.00 for the first offense and not more than $200.00 for each subsequent offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 59, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1971, No. 69

, § 13, eff. April 15, 1971;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2767.
Injunction.

The Secretary may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for, and the court upon hearing and for cause shown may grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 60, eff. April 14, 1967; amended

1991, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2768.
Validity of prosecutions.

Prosecutions for violation of this chapter are declared to be valid and proper notwithstanding the existence of any other valid general or specific act of this State dealing with matters that may be the same as or similar to those covered by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 61, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2769.
Presumptive evidence.

For the purposes of this chapter, proof of the existence of a weight or measure or a weighing or measuring device in or about any building, enclosure, stand, or vehicle in which or from which it is shown that buying or selling is commonly carried on, shall, in the absence of conclusive evidence to the contrary, be presumptive proof of the regular use of such weight or measure or weighing or measuring device for commercial purposes and of that use by the person in charge of the building, enclosure, stand, or vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 102

, § 62, eff. April 14, 1967.

§ 2770.
Administrative penalties; license suspension.

In addition to other penalties provided by law, the Secretary may assess administrative penalties under

6 V.S.A. § 15

for each violation of this chapter. Each violation may be a separate and distinct offense, and, in the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance thereof may be deemed a separate and distinct offense.

After notice and opportunity for hearing, the Secretary may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter for any violation of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 2771.
Deceptive acts or practices.

In addition to other penalties provided by law, a violation of this chapter or rule adopted thereunder shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice in commerce subject to the penalty provisions established in chapter 63 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 28, 1992.